Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.300

Central College fund—Moneys transferred to general fund.

All moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the Central College fund on the first day of May, 1955, and all moneys thereafter paid into the state treasury for or to the credit of the Central College fund, shall be and are hereby transferred to and placed in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.300. Prior: 1955 c 333 s 1.]